Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3805
Commission; members; compensation; expenses.

The members of the commission shall each receive fifty dollars for each day spent in the performance of their duties and shall receive reimbursement for any expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 32.